spellchecker/hunspell/bak/bash (1).aff
FLAG num
SFX 195 Y 2935 # существительные Noun +PxSg1
SFX 195 0 ым . +PxSg1
SFX 195 0 ың . +PxSg2
SFX 195 0 ы . +PxSg3
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙ . +PxPl1
SFX 195 0 ығыҙ . +PxPl2
SFX 195 0 ымдар . +PxSg1+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыңдар . +PxSg2+Pl
SFX 195 0 ылар . +PxSg3+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙар . +PxPl1+Pl
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙар . +PxPl2+Pl
SFX 195 0 ымдарҙың . +PxSg1+Pl+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыңдарҙың . +PxSg2+Pl+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыларҙың . +PxSg3+Pl+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙарҙың . +PxPl1+Pl+Gen
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙарҙың . +PxPl2+Pl+Gen
SFX 195 0 ымдарға . +PxSg1+Pl+Dat
SFX 195 0 ыңдарға . +PxSg2+Pl+Dat
SFX 195 0 ыларға . +PxSg3+Pl+Dat
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙарға . +PxPl1+Pl+Dat
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙарға . +PxPl2+Pl+Dat
SFX 195 0 ымдарҙы . +PxSg1+Pl+Acc
SFX 195 0 ыңдарҙы . +PxSg2+Pl+Acc
SFX 195 0 ыларҙы . +PxSg3+Pl+Acc
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙарҙы . +PxPl1+Pl+Acc
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙарҙы . +PxPl2+Pl+Acc
SFX 195 0 ымдарҙан . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl
SFX 195 0 ыңдарҙан . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl
SFX 195 0 ыларҙан . +PxSg3+Pl+Abl
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙарҙан . +PxPl1+Pl+Abl
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙарҙан . +PxPl2+Pl+Abl
SFX 195 0 ымдарҙа . +PxSg1+Pl+Loc
SFX 195 0 ыңдарҙа . +PxSg2+Pl+Loc
SFX 195 0 ыларҙа . +PxSg3+Pl+Loc
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙарҙа . +PxPl1+Pl+Loc
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙарҙа . +PxPl2+Pl+Loc
SFX 195 0 ымдың . +PxSg1+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыңдың . +PxSg2+Gen
SFX 195 0 ының . +PxSg3+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙың . +PxPl1+Gen
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙың . +PxPl2+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыма . +PxSg1+Dat
SFX 195 0 ыңа . +PxSg2+Dat
SFX 195 0 ына . +PxSg3+Dat
SFX 195 0 ынараҡ . +PxSg3+Dat+Comp
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙға . +PxPl1+Dat
SFX 195 0 ығыҙға . +PxPl2+Dat
SFX 195 0 ымды . +PxSg1+Acc
SFX 195 0 ыңды . +PxSg2+Acc
SFX 195 0 ын . +PxSg3+Acc
SFX 195 0 ындай . +PxSg3+Acc+Der/дай
SFX 195 0 ынса . +PxSg3+Acc+Der/са
SFX 195 0 ынсараҡ . +PxSg3+Acc+Der/са+Comp
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙы . +PxPl1+Acc
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙы . +PxPl2+Acc
SFX 195 0 ымдан . +PxSg1+Abl
SFX 195 0 ыңдан . +PxSg2+Abl
SFX 195 0 ынан . +PxSg3+Abl
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙан . +PxPl1+Abl
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙан . +PxPl2+Abl
SFX 195 0 ымда . +PxSg1+Loc
SFX 195 0 ыңда . +PxSg2+Loc
SFX 195 0 ында . +PxSg3+Loc
SFX 195 0 ындараҡ . +PxSg3+Loc+Comp
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙа . +PxPl1+Loc
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙа . +PxPl2+Loc
SFX 195 0 ымдыңдар . +PxSg1+Gen+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыңдыңдар . +PxSg2+Gen+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыныңдар . +PxSg3+Gen+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыңдар . +PxPl1+Gen+Pl
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыңдар . +PxPl2+Gen+Pl
SFX 195 0 ымалар . +PxSg1+Dat+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыңалар . +PxSg2+Dat+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыналар . +PxSg3+Dat+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙғалар . +PxPl1+Dat+Pl
SFX 195 0 ығыҙғалар . +PxPl2+Dat+Pl
SFX 195 0 ымдылар . +PxSg1+Acc+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыңдылар . +PxSg2+Acc+Pl
SFX 195 0 ындар . +PxSg3+Acc+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙылар . +PxPl1+Acc+Pl
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙылар . +PxPl2+Acc+Pl
SFX 195 0 ымдандар . +PxSg1+Abl+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыңдандар . +PxSg2+Abl+Pl
SFX 195 0 ынандар . +PxSg3+Abl+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙандар . +PxPl1+Abl+Pl
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙандар . +PxPl2+Abl+Pl
SFX 195 0 ымдалар . +PxSg1+Loc+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыңдалар . +PxSg2+Loc+Pl
SFX 195 0 ындалар . +PxSg3+Loc+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙалар . +PxPl1+Loc+Pl
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙалар . +PxPl2+Loc+Pl
SFX 195 0 ымдыңмы . +PxSg1+Gen+Q
SFX 195 0 ыңдыңмы . +PxSg2+Gen+Q
SFX 195 0 ыныңмы . +PxSg3+Gen+Q
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыңмы . +PxPl1+Gen+Q
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыңмы . +PxPl2+Gen+Q
SFX 195 0 ымамы . +PxSg1+Dat+Q
SFX 195 0 ыңамы . +PxSg2+Dat+Q
SFX 195 0 ынамы . +PxSg3+Dat+Q
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙғамы . +PxPl1+Dat+Q
SFX 195 0 ығыҙғамы . +PxPl2+Dat+Q
SFX 195 0 ымдымы . +PxSg1+Acc+Q
SFX 195 0 ыңдымы . +PxSg2+Acc+Q
SFX 195 0 ынмы . +PxSg3+Acc+Q
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙымы . +PxPl1+Acc+Q
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙымы . +PxPl2+Acc+Q
SFX 195 0 ымданмы . +PxSg1+Abl+Q
SFX 195 0 ыңданмы . +PxSg2+Abl+Q
SFX 195 0 ынанмы . +PxSg3+Abl+Q
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙанмы . +PxPl1+Abl+Q
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙанмы . +PxPl2+Abl+Q
SFX 195 0 ымдамы . +PxSg1+Loc+Q
SFX 195 0 ыңдамы . +PxSg2+Loc+Q
SFX 195 0 ындамы . +PxSg3+Loc+Q
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙамы . +PxPl1+Loc+Q
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙамы . +PxPl2+Loc+Q
SFX 195 0 ымдыңмылыр . +PxSg1+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдыңмылыр . +PxSg2+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыныңмылыр . +PxSg3+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыңмылыр . +PxPl1+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыңмылыр . +PxPl2+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымамылыр . +PxSg1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңамылыр . +PxSg2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ынамылыр . +PxSg3+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙғамылыр . +PxPl1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙғамылыр . +PxPl2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдымылыр . +PxSg1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдымылыр . +PxSg2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ынмылыр . +PxSg3+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙымылыр . +PxPl1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙымылыр . +PxPl2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымданмылыр . +PxSg1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңданмылыр . +PxSg2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ынанмылыр . +PxSg3+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙанмылыр . +PxPl1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙанмылыр . +PxPl2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдамылыр . +PxSg1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдамылыр . +PxSg2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ындамылыр . +PxSg3+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙамылыр . +PxPl1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙамылыр . +PxPl2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдыңдыр . +PxSg1+Gen+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдыңдыр . +PxSg2+Gen+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыныңдыр . +PxSg3+Gen+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыңдыр . +PxPl1+Gen+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыңдыр . +PxPl2+Gen+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымалыр . +PxSg1+Dat+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңалыр . +PxSg2+Dat+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыналыр . +PxSg3+Dat+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙғалыр . +PxPl1+Dat+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙғалыр . +PxPl2+Dat+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдылыр . +PxSg1+Acc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдылыр . +PxSg2+Acc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ындыр . +PxSg3+Acc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙылыр . +PxPl1+Acc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙылыр . +PxPl2+Acc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдандыр . +PxSg1+Abl+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдандыр . +PxSg2+Abl+Indf
SFX 195 0 ынандыр . +PxSg3+Abl+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙандыр . +PxPl1+Abl+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙандыр . +PxPl2+Abl+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдалыр . +PxSg1+Loc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдалыр . +PxSg2+Loc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ындалыр . +PxSg3+Loc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙалыр . +PxPl1+Loc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙалыр . +PxPl2+Loc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдыңсы . +PxSg1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыңдыңсы . +PxSg2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыныңсы . +PxSg3+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыңсы . +PxPl1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыңсы . +PxPl2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ымасы . +PxSg1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыңасы . +PxSg2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ынасы . +PxSg3+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙғасы . +PxPl1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ығыҙғасы . +PxPl2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ымдысы . +PxSg1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыңдысы . +PxSg2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ынсы . +PxSg3+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙысы . +PxPl1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙысы . +PxPl2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ымдансы . +PxSg1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыңдансы . +PxSg2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ынансы . +PxSg3+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙансы . +PxPl1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙансы . +PxPl2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ымдасы . +PxSg1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыңдасы . +PxSg2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ындасы . +PxSg3+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙасы . +PxPl1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙасы . +PxPl2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыммы . +PxSg1+Q
SFX 195 0 ыңмы . +PxSg2+Q
SFX 195 0 ымы . +PxSg3+Q
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙмы . +PxPl1+Q
SFX 195 0 ығыҙмы . +PxPl2+Q
SFX 195 0 ыммылыр . +PxSg1+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңмылыр . +PxSg2+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымылыр . +PxSg3+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙмылыр . +PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙмылыр . +PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдыр . +PxSg1+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдыр . +PxSg2+Indf
SFX 195 0 ылыр . +PxSg3+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыр . +PxPl1+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыр . +PxPl2+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымсы . +PxSg1+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыңсы . +PxSg2+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ысы . +PxSg3+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙсы . +PxPl1+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ығыҙсы . +PxPl2+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡы . +PxSg1+Poss
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡы . +PxSg2+Poss
SFX 195 0 ыныҡы . +PxSg3+Poss
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡы . +PxPl1+Poss
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡы . +PxPl2+Poss
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡылар . +PxSg1+Poss+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡылар . +PxSg2+Poss+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыныҡылар . +PxSg3+Poss+Pl
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡылар . +PxPl1+Poss+Pl
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡылар . +PxPl2+Poss+Pl
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡыларҙың . +PxSg1+Poss+Pl+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡыларҙың . +PxSg2+Poss+Pl+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыныҡыларҙың . +PxSg3+Poss+Pl+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡыларҙың . +PxPl1+Poss+Pl+Gen
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡыларҙың . +PxPl2+Poss+Pl+Gen
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡыларға . +PxSg1+Poss+Pl+Dat
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡыларға . +PxSg2+Poss+Pl+Dat
SFX 195 0 ыныҡыларға . +PxSg3+Poss+Pl+Dat
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡыларға . +PxPl1+Poss+Pl+Dat
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡыларға . +PxPl2+Poss+Pl+Dat
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡыларҙы . +PxSg1+Poss+Pl+Acc
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡыларҙы . +PxSg2+Poss+Pl+Acc
SFX 195 0 ыныҡыларҙы . +PxSg3+Poss+Pl+Acc
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡыларҙы . +PxPl1+Poss+Pl+Acc
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡыларҙы . +PxPl2+Poss+Pl+Acc
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡыларҙан . +PxSg1+Poss+Pl+Abl
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡыларҙан . +PxSg2+Poss+Pl+Abl
SFX 195 0 ыныҡыларҙан . +PxSg3+Poss+Pl+Abl
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡыларҙан . +PxPl1+Poss+Pl+Abl
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡыларҙан . +PxPl2+Poss+Pl+Abl
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡыларҙа . +PxSg1+Poss+Pl+Loc
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡыларҙа . +PxSg2+Poss+Pl+Loc
SFX 195 0 ыныҡыларҙа . +PxSg3+Poss+Pl+Loc
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡыларҙа . +PxPl1+Poss+Pl+Loc
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡыларҙа . +PxPl2+Poss+Pl+Loc
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡының . +PxSg1+Poss+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡының . +PxSg2+Poss+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыныҡының . +PxSg3+Poss+Gen
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡының . +PxPl1+Poss+Gen
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡының . +PxPl2+Poss+Gen
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡына . +PxSg1+Poss+Dat
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡына . +PxSg2+Poss+Dat
SFX 195 0 ыныҡына . +PxSg3+Poss+Dat
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡына . +PxPl1+Poss+Dat
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡына . +PxPl2+Poss+Dat
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡын . +PxSg1+Poss+Acc
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡын . +PxSg2+Poss+Acc
SFX 195 0 ыныҡын . +PxSg3+Poss+Acc
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡын . +PxPl1+Poss+Acc
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡын . +PxPl2+Poss+Acc
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡынан . +PxSg1+Poss+Abl
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡынан . +PxSg2+Poss+Abl
SFX 195 0 ыныҡынан . +PxSg3+Poss+Abl
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡынан . +PxPl1+Poss+Abl
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡынан . +PxPl2+Poss+Abl
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡында . +PxSg1+Poss+Loc
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡында . +PxSg2+Poss+Loc
SFX 195 0 ыныҡында . +PxSg3+Poss+Loc
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡында . +PxPl1+Poss+Loc
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡында . +PxPl2+Poss+Loc
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡыныңмы . +PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡыныңмы . +PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX 195 0 ыныҡыныңмы . +PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡыныңмы . +PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡыныңмы . +PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡынамы . +PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡынамы . +PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX 195 0 ыныҡынамы . +PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡынамы . +PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡынамы . +PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡынмы . +PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡынмы . +PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX 195 0 ыныҡынмы . +PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡынмы . +PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡынмы . +PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡынанмы . +PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡынанмы . +PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX 195 0 ыныҡынанмы . +PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡынанмы . +PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡынанмы . +PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡындамы . +PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡындамы . +PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX 195 0 ыныҡындамы . +PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡындамы . +PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡындамы . +PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡыныңдыр . +PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡыныңдыр . +PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыныҡыныңдыр . +PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡыныңдыр . +PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡыныңдыр . +PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡыналыр . +PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡыналыр . +PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыныҡыналыр . +PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡыналыр . +PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡыналыр . +PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡындыр . +PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡындыр . +PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыныҡындыр . +PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡындыр . +PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡындыр . +PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡынандыр . +PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡынандыр . +PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыныҡынандыр . +PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡынандыр . +PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡынандыр . +PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡындалыр . +PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡындалыр . +PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыныҡындалыр . +PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ыбыҙҙыҡындалыр . +PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ығыҙҙыҡындалыр . +PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX 195 0 ымдыҡыныңсы . +PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 195 0 ыңдыҡыныңсы . +PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
